Mississippi, session 2026, SB2120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Cost-sharing requirement" means a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense. (b)  "Men with a family history of prostate cancer" means men who have a relative within the first-degree of kinship: (i)  Who has been diagnosed with prostate cancer; (ii)  Who developed prostate cancer; (iii)  Whose death was a result of prostate cancer; (iv)  Who has been diagnosed with a cancer known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer; or (v)  Who has a genetic alteration known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (c)  "Men with a high risk for prostate cancer" means the following: (i)  Men with a family history of prostate cancer who are between forty (40) and forty-nine (49) years of age; (ii)  Men with risk factors as defined by the most recent National Comprehensive Cancer Network Guidelines who are between forty (40) and forty-nine (49) years of age; (iii)  Men who are fifty (50) years of age and older; and (iv)  Other men who exhibit potential signs or symptoms of prostate cancer, as determined by a physician. (d)  "Prostate cancer screening" means a medically necessary and appropriate examination of the prostate performed in accordance with the most recent National Comprehensive Cancer Network Guidelines, including, but not limited to, such an examination using the prostate-specific antigen test or digital rectal exam, that is: (i)  Used to detect and diagnose prostate cancer; and (ii)  Based on personal or family medical history or additional prostate cancer risk factors. (2)  Any group health plan or a health insurance insurer offering group or individual health insurance shall include coverage for annual prostate cancer screenings for men with a high risk for prostate cancer. (3)  A group health plan or a health insurance issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage that provides coverage for annual prostate cancer screenings required under subsection (2) of this section to an individual enrolled under such plan shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements for those screenings. (4)  Except for cancer policies, nothing in this section shall apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicaid, Medicare supplement, long-term care or limited benefit health insurance policies, or to the State and School Employees' Health Insurance Plan policies. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.